Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.185

School gardens or farms.

(1) School districts may operate school gardens or farms, as appropriate, for the purpose of growing fruits and vegetables to be used for educational purposes and, where appropriate, to be offered to students through the district nutrition services meal and snack programs. All such foods used in the district's meal and snack programs shall meet appropriate safety standards.

(2) If a school operates a school garden or farm, students representing various student organizations, including but not limited to vocational programs such as the FFA and 4-H, shall be given the opportunity to be involved in the operation of a school garden or farm.

(3) When school gardens or farms are used to educate students about agricultural practices, students shall be afforded the opportunity to learn about both organic and conventional growing methods.

[ 2008 c 215 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—Captions not law—Conflict with federal requirements—2008 c 215: See notes following RCW 15.64.060.